Arkansas, session 2025, HB1814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-200-101(a), concerning the definition of
"public utility", is amended to read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “public utility” means any electric, gas,
sewer, water, or telephone company or utility, and any company or utility
providing similar services, except a company excluded from the definition of
“public utility” under § 23-1-101(9)(B)(ii), a consolidated utility district
under the General Consolidated Public Utility System Improvement District
Law, § 14-217-101 et seq., and a water or light commission under § 14-201-101
et seq §§ 14-201-101 — 14-201-129.

/s/Gazaway



*ANS367*
04-02-2025 14:28:11 ANS367